Idaho, session 2026, S1352.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 65, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-6541, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-6541. STARTER HOME SUBDIVISIONS. (1) No city shall enact or enforce
any ordinance within its jurisdiction that bans starter home subdivisions
in any residential zoning area. "Starter home subdivision" means a resi-
dential subdivision on at least four (4) acres of land that is designed to
provide attainable homeownership opportunities with single-family detached
dwellings on smaller lots that are no greater than one thousand five hundred
(1,500) square feet per lot, have compact home sizes, and have efficient site
design that reduces development costs while maintaining compatibility with
surrounding neighborhoods.
(2) By February 1, 2027, by resolution or ordinance adopted, amended,
or repealed in accordance with the notice and hearing procedures provided
in section 67-6509, Idaho Code, each city governing board shall amend its
comprehensive plan and land use regulations to allow starter home subdivi-
sions in residential zoning districts, except for lands falling within an
area defined as a historic district in section 67-4607, Idaho Code, or des-
ignated as a historic property pursuant to section 67-4614, Idaho Code. For
starter home subdivisions, a city's comprehensive plan and land use regula-
tions shall be amended to:
(a) Prohibit requiring minimum lot sizes exceeding one thousand five
hundred (1,500) square feet for lots located in starter home subdivi-
sions unless infrastructure limitations, lot configuration, or envi-
ronmental constraints make it unfeasible;
(b) Prohibit requiring front or rear setbacks exceeding fifteen (15)
feet or side setbacks exceeding five (5) feet for a primary residential
structure on a lot, provided, however, that setbacks along the perime-
ter of a project may be required to match setbacks of abutting zoning
districts;
(c) Prohibit requiring lot front widths exceeding thirty (30) feet for
narrow lots;
(d) Prohibit requiring lot depths exceeding seventy (70) feet, unless
overall lot shape, topography, or environmental or infrastructure con-
straints require it; and


(e) Prohibit imposing permit fees, development impact fees, or util-
ity connection fees for starter home subdivisions exceeding those that
would be imposed on other single-family home subdivisions. A local
government may provide incentives to builders through fee reductions or
waivers for compliance with smaller lot and setback options.
(3) The provisions of this section shall not supersede state or local
laws that protect public health, safety, and welfare, including:
(a) Building codes, fire safety standards, and flood plain regula-
tions;
(b) Laws regarding water, sewer, storm drainage, road access, roadway
classifications or conditions, infrastructure capacity constraints,
and utility services necessary to support the required density;
(c) Laws regarding environmental hazards, aquifer recharge zones,
steep slopes, or critical habitat protections; and
(d) Laws and regulations regarding setback requirements for rights-of-
way and easements.
(4) The provisions of this section shall apply only to cities with a
population greater than ten thousand (10,000).
(5) Cities may condition or deny approval of a starter home subdivision
where the city determines that existing or planned infrastructure is inade-
quate to support the subdivision, to the same extent and under the same stan-
dards the city applies to other residential subdivisions.
(6) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a city from enacting regula-
tions, standards, or conditions that are less restrictive than the require-
ments provided in this section.
SECTION 2. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.